Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Part 1. Registration for Enforcement of Support Order.

§ 93-25-601.
Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state for enforcement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-602.
Procedure to register order for enforcement.

Except as provided in Section 93-25-706, a support order or income-withholding order of another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state by sending the following records to the appropriate tribunal in this state:

A letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

Two (2) copies, including one (1) certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

A sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

The name of the obligor and, if known:

The obligor’s address and social security number;

The name and address of the obligor’s employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

A description and the location of property of the obligor in this state not exempt from execution; and

Except as otherwise provided in Section 93-25-312, the name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as an order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign support order, together with one (1) copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

A complaint or comparable pleading seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under other law of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

If two (2) or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall:

Furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;

Specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

Specify the amount of consolidated arrearages, if any.

A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-603.
Effect of registration for enforcement.

A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

A registered support order issued in another state or a foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered support order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-604.
Choice of law.

Except as otherwiseprovided in subsection (d), the law of the issuing state or foreigncountry governs:

The nature, extent,amount and duration of current payments under a registered supportorder;

The computationand payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearagesunder the support order; and

The existenceand satisfaction of other obligations under the support order.

In a proceedingfor arrearages under a registered support order, the statute of limitationof this state or of the issuing state or foreign country, whicheveris longer, applies.

A respondingtribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and remedies ofthis state to enforce current support and collect arrearages and interestdue on a support order of another state or a foreign country registeredin this state.

After a tribunalof this state or another state determines which is the controllingorder and issues an order consolidating arrearages, if any, a tribunalof this state shall prospectively apply the law of the state or foreigncountry issuing the controlling order, including its law on intereston arrearages, on current and future support and on consolidated arrearages.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.